Louisiana, session 2026, SB174.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The president of Louisiana Tech University, as authorized by the Board
of Supervisors for the University of Louisiana System, and the commissioner of
administration, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, are hereby
authorized and empowered to convey, transfer, assign, or deliver any interest, excluding
mineral rights, the state may have to all or any portion of the following described parcel of
property to the Caddo Parish School Board:
Lot 1, Shreve Park Industrial Campus, Unit No. 1, per plat in Conveyance
Book 2500, Pages 34-38, recorded June 6, 1997 under Registry No. 1561114
of the Records of Caddo Parish, Louisiana.
Section 2. The president of Louisiana Tech University, as authorized by the Board
of Supervisors for the University of Louisiana System, and the commissioner of
administration are hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, covenants, conditions,
and stipulations and to execute such documents as necessary to properly effectuate any
conveyance, transfer, assignment, lease, or delivery of title, excluding mineral rights, to the
property described in Section 1 of this Act, and as more specifically described in any such
agreements entered into and documents executed by and between the president of Louisiana
Tech University, as authorized by the Board of Supervisors for the University of Louisiana
System, and the commissioner of administration and the Caddo Parish School Board, in
exchange of consideration proportionate to the appraised value of the property.
Section 3. The commissioner of administration, notwithstanding any other provision
of law to the contrary, is hereby authorized and empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease,
or deliver any interest, excluding mineral rights, the state may have to all or any portion of
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 174 ENROLLED
the following described property to Old Cypress Club, LLC, Charter No. 42098023K:
Five (5) acres adjudicated to the State of Louisiana for non-payment of ad valorem
taxes for tax year 1958 out of the name of Littleton Dennis, described in said
adjudication record as 5 acs. Bd on all sides by Ida Peagram & Imps., bearing
Rapides Parish Assessor Parcel No. 2100164037001601, Parcel I.D.
#21-1-64037-16, located in Section 1, Township 1 North, Range 1 West, Rapides
Parish.
Section 4. The commissioner of administration is hereby authorized to enter into such
agreements, covenants, conditions, and stipulations and to execute such documents as
necessary to properly effectuate any conveyance, transfer, assignment, lease, or delivery of
title, excluding mineral rights, to the property described in Section 3 of this Act, and as more
specifically described in any such agreements entered into and documents executed by and
between the parties, in exchange of consideration proportionate to the appraised value of the
property.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.